src-fst-morphology-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# Lexicon over Cornish nouns

## Short overview of the types

Masculines
* **m** = ow plural
* **m-yow** = yow plural (all new 2020 masculines assigned here)
* **m-ys** = ys plural
* **m-yon** = yon plural
* **m-yn** = yn plural 	*not implemented yet*
* **m-ag** = -(y)er agent nouns
* **m-es** = -es plural
* **m-ens	** = -ens plural 	*not implemented yet*
* **m-s** = -s plural
* **m-** = balek-wörter
* **m-dual** = Duals		*not implemented yet*
* **m-aff** = Root vowel change
* **m-yon** = yon plural
* **m-aff-i** = i plural
* **m-sgtantum** = Singularia tantum
* **m-pltantum** = Pluralia tantum

Feminines
* **f** = ow plural
* **f-yow** = yow plural
* **f-yon** = yon plural

## The stems

* **LEXICON Noun** contains all the nouns 

## Exceptions

ki, den, ojyon, ...

## Regular nouns

## Masculine

### lexc syntax:
lemmaform:stem continuationlexicon "facultative translation" ;
without the colon, lemmaform and stem are identical.
The morphology is then handeled in noun-kor-morph.txt

Here the noun types begin:

### ow plural
All -(y)ans nouns are here even though the dictionary lists no plurals for them (Brown, p. 30)
* abatti m "abbey" ; 
* abes m "abbot" ; 
...

yow plural
* aber m-yow "river mouth" ; 
* grogys m-yow "belt" ; 
...

ys plural
* acheson m-ys "reason" ; 
* adamant m-ys "diamond" ; 
...

yon plural
* akontydh m-yon "accountant" ; 

-(y)er agent nouns
* aghskrifer:aghskrifor m-ag "genealogist" ; 
* bleujenner:bleujennor m-ag "florist" ; 
* begyer+N+Msc:begyor yonpl "beggar" ;  also m-s

-es plural

* baban m-es "baby" ; 
* badh m-es "boar" ; 

-s plural

* bacheler m-s "bachelor" ; 
* balyer m-s "balyers" ; 
...

balek-wörter

* balek:bale3k m ; 

Duals

Root vowel change

yon plural

* mab:ma4b m-yon "son" ; 

i plural

* abostol:abo4sto4l m-aff-i "apostle" ; not working yet

Singularia tantum
* adhvetter m-sgtantum "ripeness" ; 
* Afrikan m-sgtantum "African" ; 
...

Pluralia tantum
* arghans m-pltantum "money" ; MF
* mona m-pltantum "money" ;  NW
mona is here as illustration, should get a new continuation lex

## Longer lists

### Masculines

m-ow 

* lavrok:lavrog m-ow ; 
* lavrok:lavreg m-ow ; UC

m-yow 

* aber m-yow "river mouth" ; 
* anken m-yow "misery" ; 
* ankor m-yow "anchor" ; 
...

m-ys 

* kanel m-ys "tap" ; 
* mason m-ys "mason" ; 
...

### Feminines

#### Irregular feminines

* modrep:modreb f-edh ; 

#### f with ow plural 

* abases f "abbess" ; 
* tagel f "constriction, choker" ; 
...

#### f-yow 

* aden f-yow "binding board of a book" ; 
* als f-yow "cliff" ; 
...

Masculine nouns from 2020 dictionary. TODO: Check for inflection class

* 'Edhow m-yow "Jew" ; 
* 'eghes m-yow "health" ; 
* Albanian m-yow "Albanian" ; 
* Albaniek m-yow "Albanian language" ; 
* Alman m-yow "German" ; 
* alarm m-yow "alarm" ; 
* albom m-yow "album" ; 
* alejyans m-yow "allegation" ; 
...

Feminine nouns from 2020 dictionary. TODO: Check for inflection class

* 'Edhowes f "Jew" ; 
* 'eth f "language" ; 
* Afrikanes f "African" ; 
* banadhlek f "broom-brake" ; 
* banken f "bank" ; 
* banow f "sow" ; 
...

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cor/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
